Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.87.300.
Retention of records.

A certified real estate appraiser shall retain copies of all written contracts engaging the appraiser’s services for real property appraisal work, and all reports and supporting data assembled and formulated by the appraiser in preparing the reports, for at least five years after the date of the contract engaging the appraiser’s services, five years after the date of the submittal of the appraisal reports to the client, or at least two years after the final disposition of litigation in which the appraiser provided testimony related to the engagement, whichever is longer.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 42 SLA 2014.]

All records that a certified appraiser must maintain under (a) of this section shall be made available to the board or department for inspection and copying upon reasonable notice to the appraiser.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990; am §§ 6, 9 ch 42 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2014 changes to subsection (a) to certain records, see sec. 10(a), ch. 42, SLA 2014.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 19, 2014, in (a), deleted “for not less than three years” following “A certified real estate appraiser shall retain” and added the language beginning “, for at least five years after the date of the contract” to the end of the subsection; repealed (b).

Sec. 08.87.310.
Trainee appraiser; supervisory appraiser.

The board may establish requirements for trainee appraisers and supervisory appraisers. The board shall ensure that the requirements conform with 12 U.S.C. 3345.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 88 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 42 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For applicability of the 2014 changes to this section, see sec. 10(b), ch. 42, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For application and examination requirements, see 12 AAC 70, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 19, 2014, rewrote the section, which read, “(a) A person engaged in the practice of real estate appraisal who is employed by or under the direct supervision of a certified real estate appraiser may become a registered trainee by submitting proof to the board that the person has successfully completed the number of classroom hours required by the board in regulation of courses in subjects related to real estate appraisal from an appraisal organization or academic institution approved by the board. (b) A registered trainee may prepare or assist in the preparation of an appraisal report issued by a certified real estate appraiser if the report is also signed by the certified real estate appraiser and if the certified real estate appraiser accepts full responsibility for the report.”

Sec. 08.87.320.
Actions by uncertified real estate appraisers prohibited.

A person may not bring an action in a court of this state for compensation for an act done or service rendered as a certified real estate appraiser if the person did not hold a certificate under this chapter at the time that the person performed the act or service or offered to perform the act or service.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990)

Sec. 08.87.330.
Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to a person who appraises real estate as part of the tax assessment process of a municipality.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990)

Sec. 08.87.340.
Appraisals by uncertified appraisers permitted.

Nothing in this chapter precludes a person who is not certified as a real estate appraiser from appraising real estate for compensation if the person does not hold out to be a certified appraiser and if appraisal by a certified appraiser is not required by federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990)

Sec. 08.87.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“analysis assignment” means an analysis, opinion, or conclusion prepared by a real estate appraiser that relates to the nature, quality, or utility of certified real estate or real property;

“appraisal” means an analysis, opinion, or conclusion prepared by a real estate appraiser relating to the nature, quality, value, energy efficiency, or utility of specified interests in, or aspects of, identified real estate, and includes a valuation appraisal, an analysis assignment, and a review assignment;

“appraisal assignment” means an engagement for which an appraiser is employed or retained to act, or would be perceived by third parties or the public as acting, as a disinterested person rendering an unbiased analysis, opinion, or conclusion relating to the nature, quality, value, or utility of specified interests in, or aspects of, identified real estate;

“appraisal management services” includes the performance of any of the following functions on behalf of a lender, financial institution, or other person:

administration of an appraiser panel;

recruitment, retention, or selection of real estate appraisers for the performance of appraisal services;

contracting with real estate appraisers to perform appraisals;

review of a completed appraisal before the delivery of the appraisal or review assignment to the person that ordered the appraisal;

“appraiser panel” means a group of licensed or certified real estate appraisers who perform appraisals as independent contractors for a real estate appraisal management company;

“appraisal report” means any communication, written or oral, of an appraisal;

“board” means the Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers;

“borrower” means a person who applies for a mortgage loan;

“company” means a real estate appraisal management company required to register under AS

08.87.130

that performs appraisal management services;

“controlling person” means a person who

owns more than 10 percent of a real estate appraisal management company;

is an officer or director of a real estate appraisal management company;

is employed and authorized by a real estate appraisal management company to enter into a contractual relationship with another person for the performance of appraisal management services or with a real estate appraiser to perform an appraisal; or

has the authority to direct the management or policies of a real estate appraisal management company;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“general real estate appraiser” means a real estate appraiser certified to appraise all types of real property;

“institutional real estate appraiser” means a real estate appraiser employed full-time by a financial institution with offices in the state;

“principal dwelling” means a residential structure or mobile home that contains one to four units but does not include a vacation or second home unless the borrower buys or builds a new dwelling that will become the primary location that the borrower inhabits within a year after the purchase or completion of construction;

“real estate” means an identified parcel or tract of land, including improvements, but excluding subsurface natural resource values;

“real property” means one or more defined interests, benefits, and rights inherent in the ownership of real estate;

“residential real estate appraiser” means a real estate appraiser certified to appraise residential real property, subject to the limitations of AS

08.87.100

(2);

“review assignment” means an analysis, opinion, or conclusion prepared by a real estate appraiser that forms an opinion as to the adequacy and appropriateness of a valuation appraisal or an analysis assignment;

“valuation appraisal” means an analysis, opinion, or conclusion prepared by a real estate appraiser that estimates the value of an identified parcel of real estate, or identified real property at a particular time.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 42 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 67 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 1992 and 2018 to maintain alphabetical order.

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 amendments to this section, see sec. 8(a), ch. 67, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (14) [now (4)], (15) [now (5)], (16) — (18) [now (8) — (10)], and (19) [now (14)].